Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.440

[Art. 54] Record of trial.

(1) Each general court-martial shall keep a separate record of the proceedings in each case brought before it, and the record shall be authenticated by the signature of the military judge. If the record cannot be authenticated by the military judge by reason of death, disability, or absence, it shall be authenticated by the signature of the trial counsel or by that of a member if the trial counsel is unable to authenticate it by reason of death, disability, or absence. In a court-martial consisting of only a military judge, the record shall be authenticated by the court reporter under the same conditions which would impose such a duty on a member under this subsection.

(2) Each special and summary court-martial shall keep a separate record of the proceedings in each case, and the record shall be authenticated in the manner required by such regulations as the governor may prescribe.

(3)(a) A complete record of the proceedings and testimony shall be prepared:

(i) In each general court-martial case in which the sentence adjudged includes a dismissal, a discharge, or, if the sentence adjudged does not include a discharge, any other punishment which exceeds that which may otherwise be adjudged by a special court-martial; and

(ii) In each special court-martial case in which the sentence adjudged includes a dishonorable discharge.

(b) In all other court-martial cases, the record shall contain such matters as may be prescribed by regulations of the governor.

(4) A copy of the record of the proceedings of each general and special court-martial shall be given to the accused as soon as it is authenticated.

[ 1989 c 48 s 50; 1963 c 220 s 56.]